Utah statutes.
63K-4-403.   Interstate agreements authorized -- Termination -- Mutual-aid
compacts between subdivisions.
(1)  The governor is authorized to execute an interstate agreement or compact
on behalf of this state with any other state or states only consistent with
the powers herein granted concerning matters relating to a disaster affecting
or likely to affect this state.
(2)  The agreement or compact shall continue in force and remain binding on
each party state until the Legislature or the governor of such party state
takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until
30 days after notice thereof has been sent by the governor of such party state
desiring to withdraw to the governors of all other party states.
(3)  Political subdivisions are authorized to enter into mutual-aid compacts
with other political subdivisions within the state of Utah concerning matters
involving cooperative disaster response and recovery assistance support,
consistent with this act.
